Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1443HV (1) 91 sc/js H.F. 534 Section 1. Section 35A.13, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. a. For each fiscal year that the balance of the trust 3 fund on July 1 is below fifty seventy-five million dollars, 4 the interest and earnings on moneys in the fund and the first 5 five hundred thousand dollars transferred pursuant to section 6 99G.39 from the lottery fund are appropriated to the commission 7 to be used to achieve the purposes of subsection 8 . Moneys 8 appropriated to the commission under this paragraph that remain 9 unencumbered or unobligated at the end of the fiscal year shall 10 revert to the fund. 11 b. For each fiscal year that the balance of the trust fund 12 on July 1 is above fifty million dollars but the balance of the 13 fund was below fifty million dollars on July 1 of the previous 14 fiscal year, moneys transferred pursuant to section 99G.39 from 15 the lottery fund are appropriated to the commission to be used 16 to achieve the purposes of subsection 8 . Moneys appropriated 17 to the commission under this paragraph that remain unencumbered 18 or unobligated at the end of the fiscal year shall revert to 19 the fund. 20 c. For each fiscal year that the balance of the trust fund 21 on July 1 is above fifty million dollars and the balance of 22 the fund was above fifty million dollars on July 1 of the 23 previous fiscal year, moneys equal to the net income the fund 24 received in the previous fiscal year are appropriated to the 25 commission to be used to achieve the purposes of subsection 26 8 . Moneys appropriated to the commission under this paragraph 27 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the end of the 28 fiscal year shall revert to the fund. For the purposes of this 29 paragraph, âincomeâ means moneys credited to the veterans trust 30 fund pursuant to subsection 2 and moneys transferred pursuant 31 to section 99G.39 . 32 d. b. Notwithstanding paragraphs paragraph âaâ , âbâ , and 33 âcâ , moneys credited to the war orphans educational assistance 34 account shall be expended as provided in subsection 9 . 35 -1- LSB 1443HV (1) 91 sc/js 1/ 3 H.F. 534 e. c. Notwithstanding paragraphs paragraph âaâ , âbâ , 1 and âcâ , moneys transferred under subsection 6 to the county 2 commission of veteran affairs training program account shall be 3 expended as provided in section 35A.16 . 4 Sec. 2. Section 99G.39, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 3. Two million five hundred thousand dollars in lottery 7 revenues shall be transferred each fiscal year to the veterans 8 trust fund established pursuant to section 35A.13 prior to 9 deposit of the lottery revenues in the general fund pursuant 10 to section 99G.40 . However, if the balance of the veterans 11 trust fund is fifty million dollars or more, the moneys shall 12 be appropriated to the department for distribution to county 13 directors of veteran affairs, with fifty percent of the moneys 14 to be distributed equally to each county and fifty percent of 15 the moneys to be distributed to each county based upon the 16 population of veterans in the county, so long as the moneys 17 distributed to a county do not supplant moneys appropriated by 18 that county for the county director of veteran affairs , unless 19 the balance of the veterans trust fund is equal to or greater 20 than seventy-five million dollars at the beginning of the 21 fiscal year . 22